Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-349
Inventory statements; public record.

All inventory statements required in sections 23-346 and 23-347 shall be filed with the county clerk as a public record, and shall be open to the inspection of the public.

Laws 1939, c. 28, § 2, p. 141;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-759;

R.S.1943, § 23-349.